Utah statutes.
73-10-29.   Additional amounts allocated -- Repayment.
The board, in addition to the amount allocated to a project to cover the
actual cost of construction, may allocate to the project constructed by it,
under contract or otherwise, such amounts as may be determined by it for
investigating, engineering, inspection, and other expenses, and may provide
for the repayment of the same out of the first moneys repayable from the
project under the contract for its construction, and such moneys so repaid
shall be accounted for within the Water Resources Construction Fund, to be
used by the board for the purpose of making investigations for the development
of the water resources of the state.
